Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 21

Poor Asylums

71-5-2101. Provision by county legislative body.

There may be provided, at the expense of every county, an asylum for the poor of the county, consisting of a parcel of land of such size, and of buildings on the land of such dimensions and construction, as the county legislative body may consider necessary and proper, a majority of the members being present.

Code 1858, § 1594 (deriv. Acts 1826, Private, ch. 56, § 2); Shan., § 2678; Code 1932, § 4792; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-801; Acts 1984, ch. 720, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §14-20-101.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-5-2102. Site and construction.

The site of the asylum shall be selected, and the buildings planned and constructed, solely with a view to promote the health and comfort of the inmates.

Code 1858, § 1595 (deriv. Acts 1826 Private, ch. 56, § 2); Shan., § 2679; Code 1932, § 4793; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-802, 14-20-102.

71-5-2103. Appointment of commissioners.

The county legislative body shall appoint three (3) commissioners to select the site, and to contract for and superintend the necessary buildings, upon such plan and under such rules and regulations as the legislative body may prescribe.

Code 1858, § 1596 (deriv. Acts 1826 Private, ch. 56, § 2); Shan., § 2680; Code 1932, § 4794; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-803, 14-20-103.

Cross-References. Duties of commissioners, title 71, ch. 5, part 22.

Letting out poorhouse, §71-5-2303.

71-5-2104. Appropriation of county funds.

The county legislative body may apply any county moneys in the treasury that it may deem proper to the use of the asylum.

Code 1858, § 1605; Shan., § 2689; Code 1932, § 4806; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-804, 14-20-104.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-5-2105. Powers of commissioners.

In the management of the asylum, the commissioners have the power to:

Prescribe rules and regulations for the management of the farm and for the treatment of the inmates of the asylum, and modify and change them at pleasure;

Prescribe the manner in which the inmates shall live, sleep, be clothed, and labor, if any of them are able to labor;

Appoint a suitable superintendent of the asylum;

Take from the superintendent a bond, with sufficient surety, in the penalty of five hundred dollars ($500), payable to the state, conditioned for the performance of such superintendent's duties;

Cause the superintendent to subscribe an oath, to be written on the back of the bond; and

Deliver the bond to the clerk of the county legislative body, to be preserved among the files of the clerk's office relating to the asylum.

Code 1858, § 1608 (deriv. Acts 1827 Private, ch. 112, § 6); Shan., § 2692; Code 1932, § 4809; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-805, 14-20-105.

71-5-2106. Duty of superintendent.

The superintendent shall overlook and manage the asylum and its inmates under such rules and regulations as the commissioners shall prescribe.

Code 1858, § 1609 (deriv. Acts 1827 Private, ch. 112, § 6); Shan., § 2693; Code 1932, § 4810; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-806, 14-20-106.

71-5-2107. Replacement of superintendent.

The commissioners may remove the superintendent whenever they think the good of the establishment requires it, and may fill the vacancy.

Code 1858, § 1610 (deriv. Acts 1827 Private, ch. 112, § 8); Shan., § 2694; Code 1932, § 4811; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-807, 14-20-107.

71-5-2108. Residence of inmates.

No person shall be admitted into the asylum who has not been an actual resident of the county for one (1) whole year preceding the person's application.

Code 1858, § 1607; Shan., § 2691; mod. Code 1932, § 4808; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-808, 14-20-108.

71-5-2109. Application for admission.

The commissioners shall examine all applicants for admission into the asylum, and admit or reject any applicant as they may think right. Any applicant who is rejected may appeal to the county mayor, in which case the applicant shall be examined and admitted or excluded in the discretion of the county mayor.

Code 1858, § 1606; Shan., § 2690; Code 1932, § 4807; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4807; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-809, 14-20-109; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-5-2110. Superintendent's annual report.

The superintendent shall, once every year, in the month of December, submit to the commissioners a statement of the condition of the establishment, showing:

The number of its inmates, their names, ages, sex, diseases and maladies;

The expenses of the establishment;

The production of the farm; and

Whatever else the superintendent may be required to report by the commissioners, or may consider necessary to a full showing of the state of the establishment.

Code 1858, § 1611 (deriv. Acts 1827 Private, ch. 112, § 9); Shan., § 2695; mod. Code 1932, § 4812; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-810, 14-20-110.

Cross-References. Report forwarded to county legislative body, §71-5-2210.

71-5-2111. Joint institutions.

County legislative bodies may unite in the establishment of joint homes, hospitals, almshouses or poor farms for the care of the indigent or the chronic sick of the respective counties.

The legislative body of a county, by majority vote at any regular session, may sell or otherwise dispose of the property owned by the county and used for such purposes, and may contract with one (1) or more other counties for the joint ownership, construction, control and operation of a common institution, or may contract with one (1) or more other counties for the care of its indigent or chronic sick persons in institutions owned, controlled and operated by the other county or counties.

Acts 1929, ch. 135, § 1; Code 1932, § 4795; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-811, 14-20-111.

71-5-2112. Government of joint institutions.

Any institution established jointly by counties, as provided in §71-5-2111, shall in all respects serve as a county institution of each of the counties participating, subject to the rules and regulations agreed upon by the legislative bodies of the participating counties. Such contract shall be executed by the governing body of each county by its proper officer.

Acts 1929, ch. 135, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 4796; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-812, 14-20-112.

71-5-2113. Funds for joint institutions.

For the purpose of enabling counties to contribute and participate in such joint enterprises, they are given full power to levy taxes and appropriate county funds.

Acts 1929, ch. 135, § 3; mod. Code 1932, § 4797; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-813, 14-20-113.